prince/dictionaries/lt.dic
adaptuoja/ESX
administruoti/TSXfnv
aiškėja/ENXdfi
aiškino/PSXdefjpr
akcentuoti/TNXfl
analizavo/PNXdfjprv
animuoja/ENX
anuliuoti/TNX
apibendrina/ENX
apibūdino/PNX
apvalinti/TNXfklw
ardė/PSXabdefijkp
artėjo/PNXjk
artinti/TSXjkvw
asmenavo/PNXdfv
aštrino/PSXcdeflprx
atakuoti/TNXv
atsipeikėja/ENX
atstovauti/TNXf
augti/TNXabcdfhijkl
aukoja/ESXfjkrv
aukštino/PSXdfhjkprv
aušino/PSXbfhi
aušti/TNXdi
automatizuoti/TSXp
avė/PSXaemopqtv
baiginėjo/PSXdefjkl
baisėti/TSXr
balsavo/PNXdefhl
bandėsi/Y
bandė/SYXdfprv
bando/ESXdfprv
barstėsi/Y
barstė/SYXacdefhlmnopqrtvx
baudžia/ENXefk
bausti/TNXefk
bėgo/PNXabcdefghijl
bendradarbiauti/NTXf
bendravo/PNXf
byra/ENXabcdejk
blausti/TSXm
bliauna/ENXl
blyksėti/TNXfkw
bloginti/TNXefkrvw
bloškė/PNXbegjq
bosti/TNXfnq
braižėsi/Y
braižė/SXYacdefhjknopqrtvx
brangino/PNXf
braukė/PSXadefhilmnoprx
brenda/ENXbcdegh
bręsti/TNXhjk
brido/PNXbcdegh
budo/PNXbdefin
burba/ENXabdefijk
busti/TNXbdefin
centralizuoja/ESXdfjkvw
centruoti/TSXdk
citavo/PNXf
dainuoti/TSXabcdefhklqruvw
dairėsi/Y
dalijo/YSXadfhkmnprt
dalijosi/Y
dalyti/TSXadfhkmnprt
darėsi/Y
darinėjo/PNXbcdehklnpx
daugėjo/PNXf
daužėsi/Y
daužyti/TSXabdefijkmnopqruvwx
dažė/YSXadefhjlpqrtvx
dažėsi/Y
dažo/ESXadefhjlpqrtvx
deda/ESXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
deklamavo/PSXfr
deklaruoja/ENX
dekoduoti/TSXfv
dekomponuoja/ENXfr
dėkoti/TNXfn
demaskavo/PSX
demonstruoja/ENXfr
derėjo/EPSXejklpqrw
dėstė/NXYdejkp
detalizuoja/ENX
detektuoti/TNX
didėja/ENXf
didinti/TSXdfhlpr
diferencijavo/PSXd
diktuoja/ENXfk
dingti/TNXi
diskredituoja/ENX
diskutuoti/TNXf
dokumentavo/PNX
domėti/TSXrw
domino/PNXfk
doroja/ESXabfkmnrw
draikė/YSXdfjkpv
draikėsi/Y
draudžia/ESXahklmtvwx
drėbė/PSXacdefjlmoqrv
drebino/PSXfk
drįso/PNXd
drožti/TSXadefhjknpqrv
dubliavo/PSX
duria/ENXcdefhijknopqrtvw
dusti/TNXefjln
dvigubino/PSXfrw
dvokti/TNX
džiūgauja/ESXf
džiugino/PNXefiu
egzistuoja/ENXfi
eikvoti/TSXdhptw
eksperimentuoti/TNXfv
eksportuoja/ENXd
elgti/TSXr
ėmė/PSXabdefhijklmnpqrtuvwx
emigruoja/ENXv
emuliuoja/ESXcgv
erzinti/TSXcfkow
faktorizavo/PSXk
fiksuoja/ESXlx
filtravo/PSXabdefhinv
fokusuoti/TSXkpqrvw
formuluoja/ENXhkw
funkcionavo/PNX
gadina/ESXadfkmprw
gaili/ESXaf
galėti/TNXdeloq
galvoja/ESXadfhijkmptvw
gaminti/TSXbfjnrv
garsina/ESXacdefmor
gąsdino/PSXcdefhj
gaudėsi/Y
gauna/ESXabcdfjklmnopqrwx
geidžia/ENXox
generuoti/TSXfjkvw
gerėja/ENXf
gerina/ENeXfkrvw
gęsta/ENXadejl
gimdėsi/Y
gimdo/YNXbfjrv
gimsta/ENXbclmnp
ginčijosi/Y
ginčijo/SYeXfpruvw
girdi/ESXjr
gydėsi/Y
gynė/PSXabdelmnrv
gyvuoja/ESXfo
grasė/YNXbfj
gražino/PSXdfpr
griebti/TSXdefjklnpqrvwx
grįžti/TSXgkmnq
guldė/NYXdfgjkrvw
gulinėjo/PNXadefijnv
habilituoti/TNX
ieškojo/PNXadfkr
ilgo/PNXipr
ilsi/ESXfnprv
indeksavo/PSXhk
informuoti/TNXf
inkorporuoja/ENX
interesuoti/TNXk
invertuoja/ESXk
išbadėjo/PNX
izoliavo/PNX
judėjo/PNXbcdfk
junta/ENXfr
justi/TNXfr
kainavo/PNXceh
kaitėsi/Y
kaitė/SYX
kalbėti/TSXabcefhijklnopqrvwx
kamuoja/ESXdefjlqv
kartojo/PSXbfnr
keitė/NPSXabcdfhkmnprtvw
kenkia/ENXf
ketina/ENX
kikeno/PNXfikl
kirpo/PSXabcdefhijkmnopqrtuvw
kišti/TSXabcdefhijklnopqrtuvwx
klasifikavo/PNX
klausė/NPSYXadefhijlnortvwx
klausėsi/Y
klijavo/PSXabcdefjklmnopqvwx
klysta/ENXbdefijklr
klostė/YSXabeklmnqwx
klostėsi/Y
kluso/PNXfk
koduoti/TNXbdhlntx
komentuoti/TNXbfjl
komplektuoti/TNXdhkptw
koncentruoja/ESXkw
konfigūravo/PSeXfhjkqrtvw
konstatuoti/TNX
kontaktuoja/ENXkvw
koordinuoja/ESXfkrtw
koregavo/PNXfk
kovoti/TNXbdfinpv
kraipė/YSXdfpruv
kraipėsi/Y
kramtėsi/Y
kramtė/SXYadefhjk
kratėsi/Y
kratė/SYXbdefknpqruvwx
kratyti/TSXbdefknpqruvwx
krypo/PNXdefhk
kvietė/PSXdfjklprvwx
laikėsi/Y
laipiojo/PNXadfkv
laistė/YSXadfhjkmprvw
laistėsi/Y
lakstė/YNXadfiknv
landžioti/TNXadf
lankėsi/Y
lankė/SYXabfjmn
lankstėsi/Y
laukti/TSXdfikw
laužėsi/Y
laužė/SYXabcdefhijklmnopqrtuvwx
legalizavo/PSX
lekia/ENXabcdefghijkl
lenktyniauja/ENXfv
lėtėti/TNXfkl
liepia/ENXbfn
lijo/NYXacefhijkl
linki/ENXfr
lituanizavo/PNX
lygiuoja/ESXdfkw
lošė/PSXabdfiknotx
mainė/YSXbdfhkmnw
mainėsi/Y
maino/ESXbdfhkmnw
maišėsi/Y
mala/ESXcdfhjkoprvw
manė/NYXcdefiklqux
maskavo/PSXlx
materializuoti/TSXfhjkrvw
matėsi/Y
matė/SXYaefhjlqrtw
maudėsi/Y
maudė/SYXdefpqrv
mauti/TSXacdefhiklmopqrtvwx
medituoti/TNXf
mėgsta/ENXf
mėlynuoti/TNXfh
mesti/TSXabcdefhijklmoqrtwx
mėtė/YSXadefjkmpqruvw
mėtėsi/Y
mezgė/PSXacefhjklnqtvwx
minėjo/PNXfk
mirgėti/TNXek
mylėti/TSXforvw
modifikuoti/TNXf
mokėsi/Y
mokė/SYXadfijpqrtvw
moko/ESXadfijpqrtvw
motyvavo/PNXv
naikino/PSXadefkrw
naršė/NYXdfvx
naudoja/ESXdfkprvw
neigė/PNXef
nerimauti/TNX
niekinti/TNXdfk
norėti/TSXfovx
numeravo/PSXfhktw
nuodijo/YSXadejlmpqx
nuodijosi/Y
nustebo/PNX
organizuoja/ESXfhjknrtw
paišė/YSXadefhjklpqrtv
paisė/NYX
paišėsi/Y
paišyti/TSXadefhjklpqrtv
pardavė/PNXdhp
paveldėjo/PNX
pelnė/YSXrx
pelnėsi/Y
pelno/ESXrx
piktina/ESXfr
pildėsi/Y
pilotavo/PSXe
pypsėjo/PNXfk
pjaustėsi/Y
pjaustė/SXYacdefjkmqrw
pjaustyti/TSXacdefjkmqrw
platino/PSXdfipru
plinta/ENXdf
poravo/PSXdhjkptw
pranta/ENXbcfhjkmw
prašėsi/Y
prašė/SYXdfjklnoprtvwx
priešina/ESXkr
privalo/ENX
projektuoti/TSX
purtė/YSXdefjkqrvw
purtėsi/Y
purto/ESXdefjkqrvw
pustėsi/Y
pustė/SYXbcdefjklpr
ragavo/PSXdfntv
rašėsi/Y
rašė/SYXabcdefhjklmopqrtvwx
rašinėjo/PNXabcdefhjklmnpqrtvwx
realizuoja/ESX
regėjo/PNXi
reguliuoja/ESXdefhkqrw
reikia/ENXjv
rekomenduoti/TNXfx
repečkojo/PNXbcdefijpx
reprezentuoti/TSX
ridena/ESXbcdefghjklnopqrtvwx
rijosi/Y
rijo/SYXbeijkmqtv
rikti/TNXklm
rizikuoja/ENXkv
ryžo/PSXr
rodėsi/Y
rodė/SYXabcdefjlmoqrv
rodo/ESXabcdefjlmoqrv
rūpėti/TNXf
sakėsi/Y
sakė/SYXabcdefhjklnorvwx
sakinėja/ENXabcefhjklnrx
šaldėsi/Y
šaldė/SYXbcfhjkltwx
šalina/ESeXfiqr
salti/TNXa
šaudė/YSXabdfijkmnpruw
šaudėsi/Y
šauna/ESXabcdefhqt
seka/ESXbcefkqr
semti/TSXadefjklprvw
sėsti/TSXacdefhjklnovx
siekė/PNXfjw
šildėsi/Y
simbolizuoja/ESX
siūlėsi/Y
siūlė/SYXcfor
siūlyti/TSXcfor
šypsoti/TSXqrv
skaidėsi/Y
skaidė/SYXdkpw
skaitėsi/Y
skaitė/SYXcdefhjklmnoqrtvx
skaitinėti/TSXabcdefhijklmnopqrtvx
skauda/ENXfko
skenuoja/ESXefjqrv
skiria/ESXbdfhjnprtuv
skirstėsi/Y
skirstė/SXYdefhjkprtuw
sklaidėsi/Y
sklaidė/SXYdfhipru
sklandė/YNXef
skliaudė/PSXabkmnw
skraidina/ENXbef
skubėti/TNXbdefgjkl
slankioja/ENXfi
slaugė/YNXaf
slenka/ESXbcdefjlqrtv
sliuogti/TNXcdefhijl
šluoti/TSXadefijkmpqruvw
smuko/PNXacdikl
snigti/TNXafijlo
šoka/ENXabcdefghijklnoprux
sotina/ESXcfhjortv
spartina/ESXfr
spausdinti/TSXbcdhjnoptv
spėlioti/TNXf
spragtelėja/ENX
stabdėsi/Y
stabdė/SYXfjklrw
stabilizavo/PSXk
startuoti/TNXp
statėsi/Y
statė/SYXabcdefhjklmnoqrtvwx
stebina/ENeX
stingo/PNXakq
stoti/TSXabcdefhjklmnqr
studijavo/PNXbdfipr
stumdė/YSXadefhijkmpqruw
stumdėsi/Y
šturmuoti/TNX
sumavo/PSXjkvw
suokti/TNXflov
suskamba/ENX
švaistėsi/Y
švaistė/SYXdp
švaistyti/TSXdp
svarstė/YNXafh
sveikina/ESXfnr
sverti/TSXbefhrt
švilpti/TNXbdefgikq
švisti/TNXeik
taikėsi/Y
taikė/SYXbcefjklqrvw
taikyti/TSXbcefjklqrvw
taisėsi/Y
taisė/SYXabcdefjklmnorvwx
tampa/ENXfjk
tampėsi/Y
tarinėjo/PNXabcdefjlmrw
taupė/NYXfjkrvw
teigė/PNXceo
tekėjo/PNXabcdefijkl
tempti/TSXabcdefghijklmnopqrstvwx
terorizavo/PNX
teršti/TSXajklmvwx
tiekti/TNXjrw
tikrina/ESXafhiklrtuvwx
tikti/TNXabcdefjklnrw
tildė/YNXefjlrvx
timptelėjo/PNX
tirpsta/ENXabdefk
tyla/ENXejl
toleravo/PNX
transliuoti/TNXh
trasuoja/ENX
trenkti/TSXbdegjklnpqsvwx
trikdėsi/Y
trikdė/SXYfkw
triukšmauja/ENXfv
trukdėsi/Y
trukdė/SYXfkw
trukdo/ESXfkw
trūkteli/ENX
trupėjo/PNXabcdejk
turtėti/TNXdi
tuštino/PSXadfp
tvarkėsi/Y
tvarkė/SYXaefhkmqrtuvw
tvindė/YNXfjlvx
ūkauja/ENXfil
vadinti/TSXdfhkqrt
vaidinti/TNXfk
vaipė/ESXYabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwx
vaipėsi/EY
vairuoja/ENXbcdefgj
valdėsi/Y
valdė/SYXacklvwx
valgėsi/Y
valgė/SYXadefijklmnpqrtvw
vardijo/YNXcdf
vardina/ENXcdf
varėsi/Y
vargsta/ENXbdefhijkv
vartė/YSXdefkvw
vartėsi/Y
vartoti/TSXfkvw
važiuoti/TSXabcdefghijklmoquv
veikė/PNXacefijklvw
vengė/PNXdjv
verifikuoti/TNX
vertėti/TNXeq
vežė/PSXabcdefghijklnopqstvwx
vienijo/YSXakw
vienijosi/Y
viešino/PNXdf
vijosi/Y
vijo/SYXabcdefgjmnopqrvw
vinguriuoja/ESXdefvw
viršijo/NXYh
virškinti/TSXafhkw
vykdė/NYXc
vyksta/ENXbcdefg
vystė/YSXacdefhkp
vystėsi/Y
vokia/ENXekqw
žadina/ENXfjkrv
žavėjo/PSXaklw
žėri/ENXk
žiūrinėja/ESXacdefhjkoq
žlugo/PNXk
žudėsi/Y
žudė/SYXdeinpqu
žūva/ENXi
žvalgė/YSXadmrw
žvalgėsi/Y
žvelgia/ESXacefhimnoqrtw
žvygauti/TNXfk
